Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.120

Advisory or coordinating councils.

The director or the governor may establish such additional advisory or coordinating councils as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Members of such councils shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. They shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses while engaged in business of the councils in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 114; 1969 ex.s. c 239 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.